Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF940.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.01, subdivision 7b, is amended to read: Subd. 7b. Resident trust. (a) deleted text begin Resident trust meansdeleted text end A trust, except a grantor type trust, deleted text begin which eitherdeleted text end new text begin that became irrevocable on or before December 31, 1995, or was first administered in Minnesota on or before December 31, 1995, is a resident trust only if two or more of the following conditions are satisfied: new text end new text begin (1) a majority of the discretionary decisions of the trustees relative to the investment of trust assets are made in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) a majority of the discretionary decisions of the trustees relative to the distributions of trust income and principal are made in Minnesota; or new text end new text begin (3) the official books and records of the trust, consisting of the original minutes of trustee meetings and the original trust instruments, are located in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) A trust, except a grantor type trust, that became irrevocable after December 31, 1995, or was first administered in Minnesota after December 31, 1995, is a resident trust only if: new text end (1) new text begin either it:new text end new text begin (i) new text end was created by a will of a decedent who at death was domiciled in this statenew text begin ;new text end or deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end is an irrevocable trust, the grantor of which was domiciled in this state at the time the trust became irrevocabledeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (2) two or more of the following conditions are satisfied: new text end new text begin (i) a majority of the discretionary decisions of the trustees relative to the investment of trust assets are made in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (ii) a majority of the discretionary decisions of the trustees relative to the distributions of trust income and principal are made in Minnesota; or new text end new text begin (iii) the official books and records of the trust, consisting of the original minutes of trustee meetings and the original trust instruments, are located in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) new text end For the purpose of this subdivision, a trust is considered irrevocable to the extent the grantor is not treated as the owner thereof under sections 671 to 678 of the Internal Revenue Code. The term "grantor type trust" means a trust where the income or gains of the trust are taxable to the grantor or others treated as substantial owners under sections 671 to 678 of the Internal Revenue Code. deleted text begin This paragraph applies to trusts, except grantor type trusts, that became irrevocable after December 31, 1995, or are first administered in Minnesota after December 31, 1995.deleted text end deleted text begin (b) This paragraph applies to trusts, except grantor type trusts, that are not governed under paragraph (a). A trust, except a grantor type trust, is a resident trust only if two or more of the following conditions are satisfied: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) a majority of the discretionary decisions of the trustees relative to the investment of trust assets are made in Minnesota; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) a majority of the discretionary decisions of the trustees relative to the distributions of trust income and principal are made in Minnesota; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) the official books and records of the trust, consisting of the original minutes of trustee meetings and the original trust instruments, are located in Minnesota. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For purposes of deleted text begin paragraphdeleted text end new text begin paragraphs (a) andnew text end (b), if the trustees delegate decisions and actions to an agent or custodian, the actions and decisions of the agent or custodian must not be taken into account in determining whether the trust is administered in Minnesota, if: (1) the delegation was permitted under the trust agreement; (2) the trustees retain the power to revoke the delegation on reasonable notice; and (3) the trustees monitor and evaluate the performance of the agent or custodian on a regular basis as is reasonably determined by the trustees. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end